Hawaii statutes.
[§132D-6] Exceptions. The prohibitions
in section 132D-5 do not apply to:

(1) The use of flares, noisemakers, or signals for
warning, pest control, or illumination purposes by police and fire departments,
utility companies, transportation agencies, and other governmental or private
agencies or persons, including agricultural operations, in connection with
emergencies, their duties, or business; and

(2) The sale or use of blank cartridges for a show or
theater, or for signal, commercial, or institutional purposes in athletics or
sports. [L 1994, c 180, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next